District of Columbia statutes.
38-2402.09

Oversight and effect of agreements.

(a)

Oversight activities. —

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to diminish the oversight activities of the Committee on Labor and Human Resources of the Senate and the Committee on Education and Labor of the House of Representatives with respect to any agreement entered into between the Secretary of Education and Gallaudet University, and the institution of higher education with which the Secretary has an agreement under part B of subchapter I of this chapter.

(b)

Construction of agreements. —

The agreements described in subsection (a) of this section shall continue in effect, to the extent that such agreements are not inconsistent with this chapter.

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 409
renumbered as § 209, Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 101(b)(6)
Aug. 11, 1993, 107 Stat. 735, Pub. L. 103-73, § 204(g)
1981 Ed., § 31-1842.9.